Idaho, session 2025, H0393.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-604, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-604. ELECTION OF UNITED STATES SENATOR -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At
the general election, 1972, and every six (6) years thereafter, there shall
be elected one (1) United States senator. At the general election, 1974, and
every six (6) years thereafter, there shall be elected one (1) United States
senator.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of United States senator
unless he has attained the age of thirty (30) years at the time of his elec-
tion, has been a citizen of the United States at least nine (9) years and
shall reside within the state at the time of his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
secretary of state.


(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of five hundred dollars ($500) one thousand dol-
lars ($1,000), which shall be deposited in the general fund.
SECTION 2. That Section 34-605, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-605. ELECTION OF UNITED STATES CONGRESSIONAL REPRESENTATIVES --
QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At the general election, 1972, and every alternate
year thereafter, there shall be elected in each United States congressional
district a member of the United States house of representatives and any ad-
ditional number of representatives to which the state may be entitled in the
state at large.
(2) No person shall be elected to the house of representatives unless he
has attained the age of twenty-five (25) years at the time of his election,
has been a citizen of the United States at least seven (7) years and shall re-
side within the state at the time of his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
secretary of state.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of three hundred dollars ($300) five hundred dol-
lars ($500), which shall be deposited in the general fund.
SECTION 3. That Section 34-608, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-608. ELECTION OF LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At the
general election, 1974, and every four (4) years thereafter, there shall be
elected a lieutenant governor.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of lieutenant governor un-
less he shall have attained the age of thirty (30) years at the time of his
election, is a citizen of the United States and shall have resided within the
state two (2) years next preceding his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
secretary of state.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of two hundred dollars ($200) one thousand dollars
($1,000), which shall be deposited in the general fund.
SECTION 4. That Section 34-609, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-609. ELECTION OF SECRETARY OF STATE -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At the
general election, 1974, and every four (4) years thereafter, a secretary of
state shall be elected.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of secretary of state un-
less he shall have attained the age of twenty-five (25) years at the time of
his election, is a citizen of the United States and shall have resided within
the state two (2) years next preceding his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
secretary of state.


(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of two hundred dollars ($200) one thousand dollars
($1,000), which shall be deposited in the general fund.
SECTION 5. That Section 34-610, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-610. ELECTION OF STATE CONTROLLER -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At the
general election, 1974, and every four (4) years thereafter, a state con-
troller shall be elected.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of state controller unless
he shall have attained the age of twenty-five (25) years at the time of his
election, is a citizen of the United States and shall have resided within the
state two (2) years next preceding his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
secretary of state.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of two hundred dollars ($200) one thousand dollars
($1,000), which shall be deposited in the general fund.
SECTION 6. That Section 34-611, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-611. ELECTION OF STATE TREASURER -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At the gen-
eral election, 1974, and every four (4) years thereafter, a state treasurer
shall be elected.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of state treasurer unless
he shall have attained the age of twenty-five (25) years at the time of his
election, is a citizen of the United States and shall have resided within the
state two (2) years next preceding his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
secretary of state.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of two hundred dollars ($200) one thousand dollars
($1,000), which shall be deposited in the general fund.
SECTION 7. That Section 34-612, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-612. ELECTION OF ATTORNEY GENERAL -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At the
general election, 1974, and every four (4) years thereafter, an attorney
general shall be elected.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of attorney general unless
he shall have attained the age of thirty (30) years at the time of his elec-
tion, is admitted to the practice of law within the state, is a citizen of the
United States and shall have resided within the state two (2) years next pre-
ceding his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
secretary of state.


(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of two hundred dollars ($200) one thousand dollars
($1,000), which shall be deposited in the general fund.
SECTION 8. That Section 34-613, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-613. ELECTION OF SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION -- QUALIFI-
CATIONS. (1) At the general election, 1974, and every four (4) years there-
after, a superintendent of public instruction shall be elected.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of superintendent of pub-
lic instruction unless he shall have attained the age of twenty-five (25)
years at the time of his election, is a citizen of the United States, has a
bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university, and shall have
resided within the state two (2) years next preceding his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
secretary of state.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of two hundred dollars ($200) one thousand dollars
($1,000), which shall be deposited in the general fund.
SECTION 9. That Section 34-614, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-614. ELECTION OF STATE REPRESENTATIVES AND SENATORS -- QUALIFICA-
TIONS. (1) At the general election, 1972, and every alternate year there-
after, there shall be elected in each legislative district such representa-
tives and senators as they may be severally entitled.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of representative or sena-
tor unless he shall have attained the age of twenty-one (21) years at the time
of the general election, is a citizen of the United States and shall have been
a registered elector within the legislative district one (1) year next pre-
ceding the general election at which he offers his candidacy.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
secretary of state.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of thirty dollars ($30.00) two hundred fifty dol-
lars ($250), which shall be deposited in the general fund.
SECTION 10. That Section 34-615, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-615. ELECTION -- SELECTION -- OF JUSTICES OF THE SUPREME COURT --
QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At the primary election, 1972, and every alternate year
thereafter, subject to the provisions of section 34-1217, Idaho Code, there
shall be elected justices of the supreme court to fill any vacancy or vacan-
cies occasioned by the expiration of the term or terms of office of any member
or members.
(2) To be elected or appointed to the office of justice of the supreme
court a person must, at the time of such election or appointment, meet all of
the following qualifications:


(a) Be at least thirty (30) years of age;
(b) Be a citizen of the United States and an elector of the state of
Idaho;
(c) Have been a legal resident of the state of Idaho for at least two (2)
continuous years immediately preceding such election or appointment;
(d) Have been in good standing as an active or judicial member of the
Idaho state bar for at least two (2) continuous years immediately pre-
ceding such election or appointment; and
(e) Have held a license to practice law or held a judicial office in one
(1) or more jurisdictions for at least ten (10) continuous years immedi-
ately preceding such election or appointment.
For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(a) "Active," "judicial" and "good standing" have the same definitions
as those terms are given by rule 301 of the Idaho bar commission rules or
any successors to those rules;
(b) "Jurisdiction" means a state or territory of the United States, the
District of Columbia or any branch of the United States military; and
(c) "Elector" means one who is lawfully registered to vote.
(3) Each candidate for election shall file a declaration of candidacy
with the secretary of state.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of three hundred dollars ($300) one thousand dol-
lars ($1,000), which shall be deposited in the general fund.
SECTION 11. That Section 34-616, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-616. ELECTION -- SELECTION -- OF DISTRICT JUDGES -- QUALIFICA-
TIONS. (1) At the primary election, 1974, and every four (4) years there-
after, subject to the provisions of section 34-1217, Idaho Code, there shall
be elected in each judicial district a sufficient number of district judges
to fill any vacancy or vacancies occasioned by the expiration of the term or
terms of office of any member or members.
(2) To be elected to the office of district judge a person must, at the
time of such election, meet all of the following qualifications:
(a) Be at least thirty (30) years of age;
(b) Be a citizen of the United States and an elector in the judicial dis-
trict in which elected;
(c) Have been a legal resident of the state of Idaho for at least two (2)
continuous years immediately preceding such election;
(d) Have been in good standing as an active or judicial member of the
Idaho state bar for at least two (2) continuous years immediately pre-
ceding such election; and
(e) Have held a license to practice law or held a judicial office in one
(1) or more jurisdictions for at least ten (10) continuous years immedi-
ately preceding such election.
(3) Each candidate for election shall file a declaration of candidacy
with the secretary of state.


(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) two hundred
fifty dollars ($250), which shall be deposited in the general fund.
(5) To be appointed to the office of district judge, a person must, at
the time of such appointment, meet all of the following qualifications:
(a) Be at least thirty (30) years of age;
(b) Be a citizen of the United States and an elector of the state of
Idaho;
(c) Have been a legal resident of the state of Idaho for at least two (2)
continuous years immediately preceding such appointment;
(d) Have been in good standing as an active or judicial member of the
Idaho state bar for at least two (2) continuous years immediately pre-
ceding such appointment; and
(e) Have held a license to practice law or held a judicial office in one
(1) or more jurisdictions for at least ten (10) continuous years immedi-
ately preceding such appointment.
(6) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the follow-
ing meanings:
(a) "Active," "judicial" and "good standing" have the same definitions
as those terms are given by rule 301 of the Idaho bar commission rules or
any successors to those rules;
(b) "Jurisdiction" means a state or territory of the United States, the
District of Columbia or any branch of the United States military; and
(c) "Elector" means one who is lawfully registered to vote.
SECTION 12. That Section 34-617, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-617. ELECTION OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) A
board of county commissioners shall be elected in each county at the general
elections as provided by section 31-703, Idaho Code.
(2) No person shall be elected to the board of county commissioners un-
less he has attained the age of twenty-one (21) years at the time of the elec-
tion, is a citizen of the United States, and shall have resided in the county
one (1) year next preceding his election and in the district which he repre-
sents for a period of ninety (90) days next preceding the primary election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
county clerk.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of forty dollars ($40.00) one hundred dollars
($100), which shall be deposited in the county treasury.
SECTION 13. That Section 34-618, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-618. ELECTION OF COUNTY SHERIFFS -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At the gen-
eral election, 1972, and every four (4) years thereafter, a sheriff shall be
elected in every county.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of sheriff unless he has
attained the age of twenty-one (21) years at the time of election, is a citi-


zen of the United States and shall have resided within the county one (1) year
next preceding his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
county clerk.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of forty dollars ($40.00) one hundred dollars
($100), which shall be deposited in the county treasury.
(5) Each person who has been elected to the office of sheriff for the
first time shall complete a tutorial concerning current Idaho law and rules
as prescribed by the Idaho peace officers officer standards and training
academy council, unless the person is already certified as a chief of police,
peace officer or detention deputy in the state of Idaho, and shall attend
the newly elected sheriffs' school sponsored by the Idaho sheriffs' associ-
ation.
SECTION 14. That Section 34-619, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-619. ELECTION OF CLERKS OF DISTRICT COURTS -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1)
At the general election, 1974, and every four (4) years thereafter, a clerk
of the district court shall be elected in every county. The clerk of the dis-
trict court shall be the ex officio auditor and recorder.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of clerk of the district
court unless he has attained the age of twenty-one (21) years at the time
of his election, is a citizen of the United States, and shall have resided
within the county one (1) year next preceding his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
county clerk.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of forty dollars ($40.00) one hundred dollars
($100), which shall be deposited in the county treasury.
SECTION 15. That Section 34-620, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-620. ELECTION OF COUNTY TREASURERS -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At the
general election, 1974, and every four (4) years thereafter, a county trea-
surer shall be elected in every county. The county treasurer shall be the ex
officio public administrator and ex officio tax collector.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of county treasurer unless
he has attained the age of twenty-one (21) years at the time of his election,
is a citizen of the United States and shall have resided within the county one
(1) year next preceding his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
county clerk.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of forty dollars ($40.00) one hundred dollars
($100), which shall be deposited in the county treasury.
SECTION 16. That Section 34-621, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


34-621. ELECTION OF COUNTY ASSESSORS -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At the
general election, 1974, and every four (4) years thereafter, a county asses-
sor shall be elected in every county.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of county assessor unless
he has attained the age of twenty-one (21) years at the time of his election,
is a citizen of the United States and shall have resided within the county one
(1) year next preceding his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
county clerk.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of forty dollars ($40.00) one hundred dollars
($100), which shall be deposited in the county treasury.
SECTION 17. That Section 34-622, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-622. ELECTION OF COUNTY CORONERS -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) At the gen-
eral election, 1986, and every four (4) years thereafter, a coroner shall be
elected in every county.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of coroner unless he has
attained the age of twenty-one (21) years at the time of his election, is a
citizen of the United States and shall have resided within the county one (1)
year next preceding his election.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
county clerk.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of forty dollars ($40.00) one hundred dollars
($100), which shall be deposited in the county treasury.
(5) All newly elected or appointed county coroners shall attend a coro-
ner's school within one (1) year of taking office. Such school shall be spon-
sored or endorsed by the Idaho state association of county coroners.
SECTION 18. That Section 34-623, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-623. ELECTION OF COUNTY PROSECUTING ATTORNEYS -- QUALIFICA-
TIONS. (1) At the general election, 1984, and every four (4) years there-
after, a prosecuting attorney shall be elected in every county.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of prosecuting attorney un-
less he has attained the age of twenty-one (21) years at the time of his elec-
tion, is admitted to the practice of law within this state, is a citizen of
the United States and a qualified elector within the county.
(3) Each candidate shall file his declaration of candidacy with the
county clerk.
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of forty dollars ($40.00) one hundred dollars
($100), which shall be deposited in the county treasury.
SECTION 19. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.